Utah statutes.
78B-6-1314.   Service of summons and conclusiveness of judgment.
If service of process is made upon unknown defendants by publication, the
action shall proceed against the unknown persons in the same manner as against
the defendants who are named and upon whom service is made by publication.
Any unknown person who has or claims to have any right, title, estate, lien,
or interest in the property, which is a cloud on the title and adverse to the
plaintiff, who has been served as above, and anyone claiming under him, shall
be concluded by any judgment in the action even though the unknown person may
be under a legal disability.
